Utah statutes.
63M-1-1215.   Investments by Utah fund of funds.

(1)  The Utah fund of funds shall invest funds:

(a)  principally in high-quality venture capital funds managed by investment managers who have:

(i)  made a commitment to equity investments in businesses located within the state; and

(ii)  have committed to maintain a physical presence within the state;

(b)  in private venture capital funds and not in direct investments in individual businesses; and

(c)  in venture capital funds with experienced managers or management teams with demonstrated expertise and a successful history in the investment of venture capital funds.

(2) (a)  The Utah fund of funds shall give priority to investments in private seed and venture capital partnerships and entities that have demonstrated a commitment to the state as evidenced by:

(i)  the investments they have made in Utah-based entities;

(ii)  the correspondent relationships they have established with Utah-based venture capital funds; or

(iii)  the commitment they have made to expand the reach of expertise within the state by adding additional investment areas of expertise.

(b)  The manager of the Utah fund of funds may waive the priorities under Subsection (2)(a) only if necessary to achieve the targeted investment returns required to attract designated investors.

(3)  The Utah fund of funds may invest funds in a newly created venture capital fund only if the managers or management team of the fund have the experience, expertise, and a successful history in the investment of venture capital funds as described in Subsection (1)(c).

(4) (a)  An investment or investments by the Utah fund of funds in any venture capital fund may comprise no more than 20% of the total committed capital in the venture capital fund.

(b) (i)  No more than 50% of the funds invested by the Utah fund of funds may be made with venture capital entities with offices in the state established prior to July 1, 2002.

(ii)  The restriction under Subsection (4)(b)(i) shall remain in place until three additional venture capital entities open new offices in the state.

